src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-paksja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пакся: # Ordinary nouns 'field/поле' - full paradigm including MWN
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пакся
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef: паксянь
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+Indef: паксяда
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+Indef: паксянди
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+Indef: паксяфтома
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: паксяшка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef: паксяса
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+Indef: паксяста
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+Indef: паксяс
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+Indef: паксява
     пакся+N+SP+Tra+Indef: паксякс
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: паксязе
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: паксяне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: паксязень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: паксянень
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [паксязти, паксязенди]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: паксяненди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: паксядон
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: паксяфтомон
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: паксяшкан
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: паксясон
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: паксястон
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: паксязон
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: паксяван
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: паксяце
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: паксятне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: паксяцень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: [паксяцти, паксяценди]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: паксятненди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: паксядот
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: паксяфтомот
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: паксяшкат
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: паксясот
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: паксястот
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: паксязот
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: паксяват
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: паксяц
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: паксянза
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: паксянц
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: паксянзон
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: паксянцты
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: паксянзонды
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: паксядонза
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: паксяфтомонза
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: паксяшканза
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: паксясонза
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: паксястонза
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: паксязонза
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: паксяванза
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: паксяньке
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: паксяньконь
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: паксяньконди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: паксядонк
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: паксяфтомонк
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: паксяшканк
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: паксясонк
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: паксястонк
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: паксязонк
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: паксяванк
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: паксянте
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: паксянтень
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: паксянтенди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: паксядонт
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: паксяфтомонт
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: паксяшкант
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: паксясонт
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: паксястонт
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: паксязонт
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: паксявант
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: паксясна
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: паксяснон
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: паксяснонды
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: паксядост
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: паксяфтомост
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: паксяшкаст
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: паксясост
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: паксястост
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: паксязост
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: паксяваст
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: паксят
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def: паксясь
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def: паксять
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def: паксяти
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def: паксятне
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def: паксятненди    
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: паксявок
     #пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяньге
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Clt/Add/гЕ: синьге 
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: паксядовок
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяндивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяфтомовок
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяшкавок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: паксясовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: паксястовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: паксяска
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: паксявавок
     пакся+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: паксякска
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксязевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксяневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксязеньге
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксяненьге
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксязтивок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксянендивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксядонга
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксяфтомонга
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксяшканга
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксясонга
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксястонга
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксязонга
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: паксяванга
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксяцевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксяценьге
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксятненьге
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксядотка
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксяфтомотка
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксяшкатка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксясотка
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксястотка
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксязотка
# or should it be паксязтка
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: паксяватка
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксяцка
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксянзовок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксянцка
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксянзонга
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксянцтывок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксянзондывок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксядонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксяфтомонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксяшканзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксясонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксястонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксязонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: паксяванзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксянькевок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксяньконьге
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксянькондивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксядонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксяфтомонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксяшканковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксясонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксястонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксязонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: паксяванковок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксянтевок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксянтеньге
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксянтендивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксядонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксяфтомонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксяшкантовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксясонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксястонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксязонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: паксявантовок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксясновок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксяснонга
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксяснондывок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксядостка
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксяфтомостка
     пакся+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксяшкастка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксясостка
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксястостка
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксязостка
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: паксявастка
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: паксятка
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: паксяське
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: паксятьке
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: паксятивок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: паксятненьге
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: паксятнендивок
